Massachusetts, session 194th, S397.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 99. (a) The department shall develop model content for the safe storage of
firearms in consultation with the executive office of public safety and security for school districts
in order for the districts to disseminate a notice to their school communities, including families,
guardians and staff.
(b) The model content for the safe storage of firearms shall include information for the
school community regarding: (i) the life-saving importance of secure gun storage in homes and
vehicles to protect unsupervised, unauthorized children and teens from accessing firearms with
which they may cause harm; (ii) the risks of unsecured firearms to children and teens, schools,
of 2

and the wider community; (iii) actions everyone in the school community can take to keep our
communities safe including raising awareness about secure firearm storage requirements, the
safe storage of firearms pursuant to section 131L of chapter 140 , suicide prevention resources as
well as other behavioral health or educational resources.
(c) The model content developed by the department shall be published in English and
multiple languages that are representative of the needs of local communities as determined by the
department. The department shall review the model content annually.
(d) The office of the superintendent and the school committee of each school district shall
collaborate and annually distribute a notice developed pursuant to this section to the school
community, including parents and guardians who have students enrolled in the school district,
and staff, and make said information electronically accessible on the district’s webpage.
of 2